Washington statutes.
RCW 11.42.080

Claims—Duty to allow or reject—Notice of petition to allow—Attorneys' fees.

(1) The notice agent shall allow or reject all claims presented in the manner provided in RCW 11.42.070. The notice agent may allow or reject a claim, in whole or in part.

(2) If the notice agent has not allowed or rejected a claim within the later of four months from the date of first publication of the notice to creditors and thirty days from presentation of the claim, the claimant may serve written notice on the notice agent that the claimant will petition the court to have the claim allowed. If the notice agent fails to notify the claimant of the allowance or rejection of the claim within twenty days after the notice agent's receipt of the claimant's notice, the claimant may petition the court for a hearing to determine whether the claim should be allowed or rejected, in whole or in part. If the court substantially allows the claim, the court may allow the petitioner reasonable attorneys' fees chargeable against the decedent's assets received by the notice agent or by those appointing the notice agent.

[ 1997 c 252 s 31; 1994 c 221 s 38.]

NOTES:

Application—1997 c 252 ss 1-73: See note following RCW 11.02.005.

Effective dates—1994 c 221: See note following RCW 11.100.035.